District of Columbia statutes.
31-1131.01

Short title.

This chapter may be cited as “the Producer Licensing Act of 2002.”

Mar. 27, 2003, D.C. Law 14-264, § 1, 50 DCR 260
This section is referenced in § 31-631, § 31-5041.01, and § 31-5041.12.